Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 17.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201083-972
Director of Correctional Services;
inflict punishment; return of proceedings; clerk of court; duty.

Whenever the Director of Correctional Services shall
inflict the punishment of death upon a convicted person, in obedience
to the command of the court, he or
she shall make return of his or
her proceedings as soon as may be to the clerk of the court where
the conviction was had, and the clerk shall subjoin the return to the record
of conviction and sentence.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 29-2536;

Laws 2009, LB36, § 17.